Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Article 2. Terms of Employment Generally.
§ 22.1-305.1.
Mentor teacher programs.

The Board of Education shall establish, from such funds as may be appropriated by the General Assembly, mentor teacher programs utilizing specially trained public school teachers as mentors to provide assistance and professional support to teachers entering the profession and to improve the performance of experienced teachers who are not performing at an acceptable level.The Board shall issue guidelines for such mentor teacher programs and shall set criteria for beginning and experienced teacher participation, including self-referral, and the qualifications and training of mentor teachers. Such guidelines shall provide that the mentor programs be administered by local school boards, with the assistance of an advisory committee made up of teachers, principals, and supervisors, and that mentors (i) be classroom teachers who have achieved continuing contract status and who work in the same building as the teachers they are assisting or be instructional personnel who are assigned solely as mentors; (ii) be assigned a limited number of teachers at one time; however, instructional personnel who are not assigned solely as mentors should not be assigned to more than four teachers at one time; and (iii) guide teachers in the program through demonstrations, observations, and consultations to promote instructional excellence. Local school boards shall strive to provide adequate release time for mentor teachers during the contract day.

The local school board shall serve as fiscal agent for the participating school boards in matters concerning the mentor teacher programs. The Department of Education shall allocate, from such funds as are appropriated, moneys to participating school divisions for the purpose of supporting such programs which shall include, but not be limited to, compensation for mentor teachers.

History.

1989, c. 516; 1999, cc. 1030, 1037; 2013, cc. 588, 650.

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendments by cc. 1030 and 1037 are identical, and rewrote subsection A, which read: “As part of the Beginning Teacher Assistance Program, the Board of Education may establish, from such funds as may be appropriated by the General Assembly, mentor teacher programs utilizing specially trained public school teachers as mentors to provide support, orientation and guidance for beginning teachers. The Board shall issue guidelines for such mentor teacher programs and shall set criteria for beginning teacher participation and the qualifications and training of mentor teachers. Local school boards choosing to implement mentor teacher programs shall provide the Board with any information requested concerning such programs in a timely fashion.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 588 and 650 are identical, and substituted “principals, and supervisors” for “and administrators” and twice substituted “one time” for “any time” in the second paragraph of subsection A; and in subsection B, substituted “local school board” for “Board” in the first sentence, and “Department of Education” for “Board” in the second sentence.